src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
!**************************************************************************
!!!! removed PastSubj 

LEXICON V1-SL   ! 1st. Conjugation - slender

+PastInd+1P+Sg:^Verbis  NegQPast;   ! variation shílis as well as shíleas
0:^Caol V1-BR;

!**************************************************************************

LEXICON V1-BR   ! 1st. Conjugation - broad
                    
+PresInd:^Verb      V1b-PresInd;    !*** Modh Táscach - Indicative Mood
+PastInd:^Verb      V1b-PastInd;
+FutInd:^Verb       V1b-FutInd;
+PastImp:^Verb      V1b-PastImp;    
                    

+Cond:^Verb     V1b-Cond;   !*** Modh Coinníollach - Condit. Mood

                    
+PresSubj:^Verb     V1b-PresSubj;   !*** Modh Foshuiteach - Subjunctive Mood
!!!!!+Verb+PastSubj:^Verb       V1b-PastSubj;

                    
+Imper:^Verb        V1b-Imper;  !*** Modh Ordaitheach - Imperative Mood


LEXICON V1b-PresInd     ! Present Tense - Aimsir Láithreach
0:ann       NegQ;
+1P+Sg:aim  NegQ;
+1P+Sg+Emph:aimse   NegQ;
+1P+Pl:aimid    NegQ;
+1P+Pl+Emph:aimidne NegQ;
+Auto:tar   NegQ;       ! +Auto = Autonomous - saor briathar
+Rel:as^Sé      #;

LEXICON V1b-PastInd     ! Past Tense - Aimsir Chaite
        NegQPast;
+1P+Sg:as   NegQPast;   ! 14 Feb
+1P+Pl:amar NegQPast;
+1P+Pl+Emph:amarna  NegQPast;
+3P+Pl:adar NegQPast;
+Auto:adh   NegQSaor;       

LEXICON V1b-FutInd      ! Future Tense - Aimsir Fháistineach
+1P+Sg:fad  NegQ;   ! 14 Feb
0:faidh     NegQ;
+1P+Pl:faimid   NegQ;
+1P+Pl+Emph:faimidne    NegQ;
+Auto:far   NegQ;       
+Rel:fas^Sé #;

LEXICON V1b-PastImp     ! Imperfect  - Aimsir Ghnáthchaite ( past hab.)
0:adh       NegQLen;
+1P+Sg:ainn     NegQLen;
+1P+Sg+Emph:ainnse      NegQLen;
+2P+Sg:tá       NegQLen;
!!!!+3P+Sg:adh      NegQLen;
+1P+Pl:aimis        NegQLen;
+1P+Pl+Emph:aimisne     NegQLen;
!!!!+2P+Pl:adh      NegQLen;
+3P+Pl:aidís        NegQLen;
+Auto:taí       NegQLen;        

LEXICON V1b-Cond        ! Conditional Mood - Modh Coinníollach

+CM:fadh        #;  ! munster variation
0:fadh      NegQLen;
+1P+Sg:fainn        NegQLen;
+1P+Sg+Emph:fainnse     NegQLen;
+2P+Sg:fá       NegQLen;
+2P+Sg+Emph:fása        NegQLen;
!!!+3P+Sg:fadh      NegQLen;
+1P+Pl:faimis       NegQLen;
+1P+Pl+Emph:faimisne        NegQLen;
!!!+2P+Pl:fadh      NegQLen;
+3P+Pl:faidís       NegQLen;
+Auto:faí       NegQLen;        

LEXICON V1b-PresSubj        ! Present Subj. Mood - Modh Foshuiteach Láith.
0:a     NegSubj;
+1P+Pl:aimid    NegSubj;
+1P+Pl+Emph:aimidne NegSubj;
+Auto:tar   NegSubj;        

LEXICON V1b-PastSubj        ! Past Subjunctive Mood - Modh Foshuit. Caite

+1P+Sg:ainn NegQLen;
+1P+Sg+Emph:ainnse  NegQLen;
+2P+Sg:tá   NegQLen;
+3P+Sg:adh  NegQLen;
+1P+Pl:aimis    NegQLen;
+1P+Pl+Emph:aimisne NegQLen;
+2P+Pl:adh  NegQLen;
+3P+Pl:aidís    NegQLen;
+Auto:taí   NegQLen;        

LEXICON V1b-Imper       ! Imperative Mood - Modh Ordaitheach

+1P+Sg:aim  NegImper;
+1P+Sg+Emph:aimse   NegImper;
+2P+Sg:0    NegImper;
+3P+Sg:adh  NegImper;
+1P+Pl:aimis    NegImper;
+1P+Pl+Emph:aimisne NegImper;
+2P+Pl:aigí NegImper;
+3P+Pl:aidís    NegImper;
+Auto:tar   NegImper;


!***************************************************************************
LEXICON V1-BR-LV    ! 1st. Conjugation - ! Broad F Slender T 
                    ! ending in  áigh, eoigh, óigh, uaigh, úigh

                    

+PresInd:^igh^Verb  V1xa-PresInd;   !*** Modh Táscach - Indicative Mood
+PastInd:0      V1xa-PastInd;
+FutInd:^igh^Verb   V1xa-FutInd;
+PastImp:^igh^Verb  V1xa-PastImp;   
                    

+Cond:^igh^Verb V1xa-Cond;      !*** Modh Coinníollach - Condit. Mood

                    
+PresSubj:^igh^Verb V1xa-PresSubj;  !*** Modh Foshuiteach - Subjunctive Mood
!!!!!+Verb+PastSubj:^igh^Verb   V1xa-PastSubj;

                    
+Imper:0        V1xa-Imper; !*** Modh Ordaitheach - Imperative Mood


LEXICON V1xa-PresInd        ! Present Tense - Aimsir Láithreach
+1P+Sg:im   NegQ;
+1P+Sg+Emph:imse    NegQ;
0:nn        NegQ;
+1P+Pl:imid NegQ;
+1P+Pl+Emph:imidne  NegQ;
+Auto:itear NegQ;       ! +Auto = Autonomous - saor briathar
+Rel:s^Sé       #;  ! e.g. a dhós

LEXICON V1xa-PastInd        ! Past Tense - Aimsir Chaite

+1P+Sg:s        NegQPast;   ! 14 Feb
0:^Verb         NegQPast;
+1P+Pl:^igh^Verbmar     NegQPast;
+Auto:^igh^Verbdh       NegQSaor;       

LEXICON V1xa-FutInd     ! Future Tense - Aimsir Fháistineach
    V1b-FutInd; 

LEXICON V1xa-PastImp        ! Imperfect  - Aimsir Ghnáthchaite ( past hab.)
0:dh    NegQLen;
+1P+Sg:inn  NegQLen;
+1P+Sg+Emph:innse   NegQLen;
+2P+Sg:iteá NegQLen;
!!!!+3P+Sg:dh   NegQLen;
+1P+Pl:imis NegQLen;
+1P+Pl+Emph:imisne  NegQLen;
!!!!+2P+Pl:dh   NegQLen;
+3P+Pl:idís NegQLen;
+Auto:ití   NegQLen;        

LEXICON V1xa-Cond       ! Conditional Mood - Modh Coinníollach
    V1b-Cond;
    
LEXICON V1xa-PresSubj       ! Present Subj. Mood - Modh Foshuiteach Láith.
        NegSubj;
+1P+Pl:imid NegSubj;
+1P+Pl+Emph:imidne  NegSubj;
+Auto:itear NegSubj;        

LEXICON V1xa-PastSubj       ! Past Subjunctive Mood - Modh Foshuit. Caite
+1P+Sg:inn  NegQLen;
+1P+Sg+Emph:innse   NegQLen;
+2P+Sg:iteá NegQLen;
+3P+Sg:dh   NegQLen;
+1P+Pl:imis NegQLen;
+1P+Pl+Emph:imisne  NegQLen;
+2P+Pl:dh   NegQLen;
+3P+Pl:idís NegQLen;
+Auto:ití   NegQLen;        
        

LEXICON V1xa-Imper      ! Imperative Mood - Modh Ordaitheach

+1P+Sg:^igh^Verbim      NegImper;
+2P+Sg:0            NegImper;
+3P+Sg:^igh^Verbdh      NegImper;
+1P+Pl:^igh^Verbimis    NegImper;
+2P+Pl:^igh^Verbigí     NegImper;
+3P+Pl:^igh^Verbidís    NegImper;
+Auto:^igh^Verbitear    NegImper;       


!***************************************************************************
LEXICON V1-SL-LV    ! 1st. Conjugation - ! Slender F Slender T 
                    ! ending in  -éigh

                    

+PresInd:^igh^Verb  V1xb-PresInd;   !*** Modh Táscach - Indicative Mood
+PastInd:0      V1xb-PastInd;
+FutInd:^igh^Verb   V1xb-FutInd;
+PastImp:^igh^Verb  V1xb-PastImp;   
                    

+Cond:^igh^Verb     V1xb-Cond;  !*** Modh Coinníollach - Condit. Mood

                    
+PresSubj:^igh^Verb V1xb-PresSubj;  !*** Modh Foshuiteach - Subjunctive Mood
!!!!!+Verb+PastSubj:^igh^Verb   V1xb-PastSubj;

                    
+Imper:0        V1xb-Imper; !*** Modh Ordaitheach - Imperative Mood


LEXICON V1xb-PresInd        ! Present Tense - Aimsir Láithreach
+1P+Sg:im   NegQ;
+1P+Sg+Emph:imse    NegQ;
0:ann       NegQ;
+1P+Pl:imid NegQ;
+1P+Pl+Emph:imidne  NegQ;
+Auto:itear NegQ;   ! +Auto = Autonomous - saor briathar
+Rel:as^Sé  #;  ! a phléas

LEXICON V1xb-PastInd        ! Past Tense - Aimsir Chaite

+1P+Sg:^igh^Verbas      NegQPast;   ! 14 Feb
0:^Verb         NegQPast;
+1P+Pl:^igh^Verbamar    NegQPast;
+3P+Pl:^igh^Verbadar    NegQPast;
+Auto:^igh^Verbadh      NegQSaor;       

LEXICON V1xb-FutInd     ! Future Tense - Aimsir Fháistineach
+1P+Sg:ifad NegQ;   ! ?????  14 Feb
0:ifidh     NegQ;
+1P+Pl:ifimid   NegQ;
+1P+Pl+Emph:ifimidne    NegQ;
+Auto:ifear NegQ;   
+Rel:ifeas^Sé       #;

LEXICON V1xb-PastImp        ! Imperfect  - Aimsir Ghnáthchaite ( past hab.)
0:adh   NegQLen;
+1P+Sg:inn  NegQLen;
+1P+Sg+Emph:innse   NegQLen;
+2P+Sg:iteá NegQLen;
!!!+3P+Sg:adh   NegQLen;
+1P+Pl:imis NegQLen;
+1P+Pl+Emph:imisne  NegQLen;
!!!+2P+Pl:adh   NegQLen;
+3P+Pl:idís NegQLen;
+Auto:ití   NegQLen;        


LEXICON V1xb-Cond       ! Conditional Mood - Modh Coinníollach
+CM:ifeadh      #; ! munster variation
0:ifeadh        NegQLen;
+1P+Sg:ifinn        NegQLen;
+1P+Sg+Emph:ifinnse     NegQLen;
+2P+Sg:ifeá     NegQLen;
!!!!+3P+Sg:ifeadh       NegQLen;
+1P+Pl:ifimis       NegQLen;
+1P+Pl+Emph:ifimisne        NegQLen;
!!!!+2P+Pl:ifeadh       NegQLen;
+3P+Pl:ifidís       NegQLen;
+Auto:ifí       NegQLen;

    
LEXICON V1xb-PresSubj       ! Present Subj. Mood - Modh Foshuiteach Láith.
        V1xa-PresSubj;      
