src/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VerbsC1A
tuig+Verb+VTI:tuig	V1-SL;	! understand
brúigh+Verb+VTI:brúigh	V1-BR-LV;	
clóigh+Verb+VT:clóigh	V1-BR-LV;	
fuaigh+Verb+VTI:fuaigh	V1-BR-LV;	
léigh+Verb+VTI:léigh	V1-SL-LV;	! Slender, Long Vowel
pléigh+Verb+VTI:pléigh	V1-SL-LV;	
réigh+Verb+VT:réigh		V1-SL-LV;	
spréigh+Verb+VTI:spréigh	V1-SL-LV;	
téigh+Verb+VTI:téigh	V1-SL-LV;	
LEXICON VerbsC
srann+Verb+VI:srann	V1-BR;	! snore; snort; humming sound
ding+Verb+VT:ding	V1-SL;	! pl ~eacha & vt
stríoc+Verb+VTI:stríoc	V1-BR;	! streak, stripe; stroke; parting
stróic+Verb+VTI:stróic	V1-SL;	! pl ~eacha stroke; tear,
iomáin+Verb+VI+Vow:iomáin	V1-SL;	! (game of) hurling vi
stuáil+Verb+VTI:stuáil	V1-SL-LV;	! stowage; stuffing, padding; stor
cam+Verb+VTI:cam	V1-BR;	! npl ~a bend; crooked
ól+Verb+VTI+Vow:ól	V1-BR;	! drink, bheith ar an
brúcht+Verb+VI:brúcht	V1-BR;	! pl ~anna belch; burst,
riar+Verb+VT:riar	V1-BR;	! administration, management; provision; distribution;
sciáil+Verb+VI:sciáil	V1-SL-LV;	! ski;
láigh+Verb+VI:láigh	V1-BR-LV;	! vn láchan dawn
cúléist+Verb+VI:cúléist	V1-SL;	! vn ~eacht eavesdrop
éigh+Verb+VI+Vow:éigh	V1-SL-LV;	! vn éamh cry out,
crúigh+Verb+VT:crúigh	V1-BR-LV;	! capall a chrú to
iniúch+Verb+VT+Vow:iniúch	V1-BR;	! scrutinize; audit;
ionsuigh+Verb+VT+Vow:ionsuigh	V1-SL;	! plug in;
athleáigh+Verb+VT+Vow:athleáigh	V1-BR-LV;	! remelt; (of metal) refine;
coinnealbháigh+Verb+VT:coinnealbháigh	V1-BR-LV;	! excommunicate;
craobhscaoil+Verb+VT:craobhscaoil	V1-SL;	! propagate, disseminate; broadcast
bronn+Verb+VT:bronn	V1-BR;	! grant, bestow
súigh+Verb+VT:súigh	V1-BR-LV;	! absorb, suck
urscaoil+Verb+VT+Vow:urscaoil	V1-SL;	! discharge;
píob+Verb+VT:píob	V1-BR;	! hoarsen, tá mé ~tha
ruadhóigh+Verb+VTI:ruadhóigh	V1-BR-LV;	! scorch;
scoith+Verb+VTI:scoith	V1-SL;	! cut off, lop; break
scriúáil+Verb+VTI:scriúáil	V1-SL-LV;	! screw;
nasc+Verb+VTI:nasc	V1-BR;	! vn nascadh tie, bind;
taisc+Verb+VTI:taisc	V1-SL;	! store; hoard, airgead a
súraic+Verb+VTI:súraic	V1-SL;	! was V1-SL-X	! suck;
spraeáil+Verb+VTI:spraeáil	V1-SL-LV;	! spray;
craol+Verb+VTI:craol	V1-BR;	! announce, proclaim; broadcast
creid+Verb+VTI:creid	V1-SL;	! believe; suppose;
gráigh+Verb+VTI:gráigh	V1-BR-LV;	! love
LEXICON Verbs-FGB1
gléghlan+Verb+VT:gléghlan		V1-BR;
ibh+Verb+VTI:ibh		V1-SL;
tuaigh+Verb+VT:tuaigh		V1-BR-LV;
LEXICON Verbs-FGB2
arg+Verb+VT:arg		V1-BR;
athghoin+Verb+VT:athghoin		V1-SL;	! analyzed as compound: ath+ghoin
athléigh+Verb+VT:athléigh		V1-SL-LV;	! analyzed as compound: ath+léigh
athphléigh+Verb+VT:athphléigh		V1-SL-LV;	! analyzed as compound: ath+phléigh	***
athspréigh+Verb+VT:athspréigh		V1-SL-LV;	! analyzed as compound: ath+spréigh	***
barrdhóigh+Verb+VT:barrdhóigh		V1-BR-LV;	! analyzed as compound: barr+dhóigh
broc+Verb+VT:broc		V1-BR;
dímhol+Verb+VT:dímhol		V1-BR;	! analyzed as compound: dí+mhol
díreoigh+Verb+VT:díreoigh		V1-BR-LV;	! analyzed as compound: dí+reoigh
díscoir+Verb+VT:díscoir		V1-SL;	! analyzed as compound: dí+scoir
fordhóigh+Verb+VTI:fordhóigh		V1-BR-LV;	! analyzed as compound: for+dhóigh
forthacht+Verb+VT:forthacht		V1-BR;	! analyzed as compound: for+thacht
forthéigh+Verb+VT:forthéigh		V1-SL-LV;	! analyzed as compound: for+théigh
frithspréigh+Verb+VTI:frithspréigh		V1-SL-LV;	! analyzed as compound: frith+spréigh	***
imchlóigh+Verb+VTI:imchlóigh		V1-BR-LV;	! analyzed as compound: im+chlóigh
imchroith+Verb+VT:imchroith		V1-SL;	! analyzed as compound: im+chroith
leang+Verb+VT:leang		V1-BR;
leictreachlóigh+Verb+VT:leictreachlóigh		V1-BR-LV;	! analyzed as compound: leictrea+chlóigh	***
réigh+Verb+VT:réigh		V1-SL-LV;
ríomh+Verb+VT:ríomh		V1-BR;
sleáigh+Verb+VT:sleáigh		V1-BR-LV;
urchoisc+Verb+VT:urchoisc		V1-SL;	! analyzed as compound: ur+choisc
tathaoir+Verb+VT:tathaoir		V1-SL; ! (vn ~ f, gs ~e)	***???					CHECKED
LEXICON VerbsEqualVariants
scard+Verb+VTI:scard		V1-BR;	! Entry: scard, ~ach, ~aire, ~án = scaird, -each, -ire, -eán. also TO VERBS VTI
creinn+Verb+VT:creinn		V1-SL;	! creinn = crinn.
éalóigh+Verb+VI+Vow:éalóigh		V1-BR-LV;	! éalóigh = éalaigh. ***
iompóigh+Verb+VTI+Vow:iompóigh		V1-BR-LV;	! iompóigh = iompaigh. *** ???
scioch+Verb+VTI:scioch		V1-BR;	! scioch = scuch.
staith+Verb+VT:staith		V1-SL;	! staith = stoith.
LEXICON Verb-Variants
díleaigh+Verb+VTI:díleaigh		V1-BR-LV;	! Headword: díleáigh (v.t. & i. ); (Var: díleaigh) *** ??? Test this
íbh+Verb+VTI:íbh		V1-SL;	! Headword: ibh (v.t. & i. ); (Var: íbh)
